Maryland, session 2025, HB0687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–504.
(a) In this section, “quota” means the mandating of a finite number of arrests
made or citations issued that a law enforcement officer must meet in a specified time period.
(b) A law enforcement agency may not:
(1) establish OR MAINTAIN a formal or informal quota for the law
enforcement agency or law enforcement officers of the agency; [or]
(2) use the number of arrests made [or], INVESTIGATIONS CONDUCTED,
citations issued, OR WARRANTS SERVED OR EXECUTED by a law enforcement officer as
[the sole or primary] A criterion for EVALUATION, COMPENSATION, DISCIPLINE,
promotion, demotion, dismissal, or transfer of the officer; OR
(3) REQUIRE, SUGGEST, OR REQUEST ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS OR
DIRECT AN OFFICER TO ACT FOR THE PURPOSE OF INCREASING THE NUMBER OF
INVESTIGATIONS CONDUCTED, WARRANTS SERVED OR EXECUTED, OR CITATIONS OR
ARRESTS DELIVERED BY THE OFFICER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.